test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-Clex_rammud_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    šeštuđ+V+PrfPrc: šeštum
    šeštuđ+V+Actio: šeštum
    šeštuđ+V+Actio+Ess: šeštuumin
    šeštuđ+V+Actio+Loc: šeštuumist
    šeštuđ+V+Actio+Ill: šeštuumân
    šeštuđ+V+Ger: šeštuudijn
    šeštuđ+V+VAbess: šeštuuhánnáá
    
    
         Verb - puohˊtuđ: # 
    puohtuđ+V+Inf: puohˊtuđ
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puohˊtuum
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: puohˊtuuh
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáhˊtoo
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: puáhˊtojeh
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: puohˊtuuvettee
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: puohˊtuv
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: puohˊtup
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: puohˊtuuvetteđ
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puáhˊtojeh
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puáhˊtojim
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: puáhˊtojih
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puohˊtui
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: puohˊtuim
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: puohˊtuid
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: puohˊtuin
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: puohˊtuim
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: puohˊtuid
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puáhˊtojii
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: puohˊtuuččim
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: puohˊtuuččih
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: puohˊtuuččij
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Du1: puohˊtuuččáim
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Du2: puohˊtuuččáid
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Du3: puohˊtuuččáin
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: puohˊtuuččijm
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: puohˊtuuččijd
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: puohˊtuuččii
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: puohˊtuužeem
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: puohˊtuužeeh
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: puohˊtuš      
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Du1: puohˊtuužeen
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Du2: puohˊtušvettee      
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Du3: puohˊtuužává
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: puohˊtuužep
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: puohˊtušvetteđ      
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: puohˊtuužeh
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: puáhˊtojum
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: puohˊtuu
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: puáhˊtojus
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: puáhˊtojoon
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: puáhˊtojee
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: puáhˊtojus
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: puáhˊtojop
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: puohˊtuđ
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: puáhˊtojus
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puohˊtuu
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: puohˊtum
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: puohˊtuuččii
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: puohˊtuužii
    puohtuđ+V+PrsPrc: [puáhˊtojeijee, puáhˊtojijjee]
    puohtuđ+V+PrfPrc: puohˊtum
    puohtuđ+V+Actio: puohˊtum
    puohtuđ+V+Actio+Ess: puohˊtuumin
    puohtuđ+V+Actio+Loc: puohˊtuumist
    puohtuđ+V+Actio+Ill: puohˊtuumân
    puohtuđ+V+Ger: puohˊtuudijn
    puohtuđ+V+VAbess: puohˊtuuhánnáá
    
    
         Verb - purruđ: # 
    purruđ+V+Inf: purruđ
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purruum
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: purruuh
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: porroo
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: porrojeen
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: purruuvettee
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: purruv
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: purrup
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: purruuvetteđ
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: porrojeh
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: porrojim
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: porrojih
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: purrui
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: purruim
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: purruid
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: purruin
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: purruim
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: purruid
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: porrojii
    purruđ+V+Cond+Sg1: purruuččim
    purruđ+V+Cond+Sg2: purruuččih
    purruđ+V+Cond+Sg3: purruuččij
    purruđ+V+Cond+Du1: purruuččáim
    purruđ+V+Cond+Du2: purruuččáid
    purruđ+V+Cond+Du3: purruuččáin
    purruđ+V+Cond+Pl1: purruuččijm
    purruđ+V+Cond+Pl2: purruuččijd
    purruđ+V+Cond+Pl3: purruuččii
    purruđ+V+Pot+Sg1: purruužeem
    purruđ+V+Pot+Sg2: purruužeeh
    purruđ+V+Pot+Sg3: purruš      
    purruđ+V+Pot+Du1: purruužeen
    purruđ+V+Pot+Du2: purrušvettee      
    purruđ+V+Pot+Du3: purruužává
    purruđ+V+Pot+Pl1: purruužep
    purruđ+V+Pot+Pl2: purrušvetteđ      
    purruđ+V+Pot+Pl3: purruužeh
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: porrojum
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: purruu
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: porrojus
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Du1: porrojoon
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Du2: porrojee
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Du3: porrojus
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: porrojop
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: purruđ
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: porrojus
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: purruu
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: purrum
    purruđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: purruuččii
    purruđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: purruužii
    purruđ+V+PrsPrc: [porrojeijee, porrojijjee]
    purruđ+V+PrfPrc: purrum
    purruđ+V+Actio: purrum
    purruđ+V+Actio+Ess: purruumin
    purruđ+V+Actio+Loc: purruumist
    purruđ+V+Actio+Ill: purruumân
    purruđ+V+Ger: purruudijn
    purruđ+V+VAbess: purruuhánnáá
    
    
         Verb - semmuđ: # 
    semmuđ+V+Inf: semmuđ
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: semmuum
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: semmuuh
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siämˊmoo
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: siämˊmojeen
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: semmuuvettee
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: semmuv
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: semmup
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: semmuuvetteđ
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: siämˊmojeh
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: siämˊmojim
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: siämˊmojih
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: semmui
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: semmuim
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: semmuid
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: semmuin
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: semmuim
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: semmuid
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: siämˊmojii
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: semmuuččim
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: semmuuččih
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: semmuuččij
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Du1: semmuuččáim
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Du2: semmuuččáid
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Du3: semmuuččáin
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: semmuuččijm
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: semmuuččijd
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: semmuuččii
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: semmuužeem
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: semmuužeeh
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: semmuš      
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Du1: semmuužeen
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Du2: semmušvettee      
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Du3: semmuužává
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: semmuužep
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: semmušvetteđ      
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: semmuužeh
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: siämˊmojum
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: semmuu
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: siämˊmojus
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: siämˊmojoon
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: siämˊmojee
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: siämˊmojus
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: siämˊmojop
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: semmuđ
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: siämˊmojus
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: semmuu
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: semmun
    semmuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: semmuuččii
    semmuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: semmuužii
    semmuđ+V+PrsPrc: [siämˊmojeijee, siämˊmojijjee]
    semmuđ+V+PrfPrc: semmun
    semmuđ+V+Actio: semmun
    semmuđ+V+Actio+Ess: semmuumin
    semmuđ+V+Actio+Loc: semmuumist
    semmuđ+V+Actio+Ill: semmuumân
    semmuđ+V+Ger: semmuudijn
    semmuđ+V+VAbess: semmuuhánnáá

    
    
